Utah statutes.
9-4-620.   Bonds and other obligations -- Additional powers of authority.
In connection with the issuance of bonds or the incurring of obligations under
leases and in order to secure the payment of bonds or obligations, an
authority, in addition to its other powers, may:
(1)  pledge all or any part of its gross or net rents, fees, or revenues to
which its right then exists or thereafter accrue;
(2)  mortgage all or any part of its real or personal property owned or
thereafter acquired;
(3)  covenant against pledging all or any part of its rents, fees, and
revenues, or against mortgaging all or any part of its real or personal
property to which its right or title then exists or thereafter accrues, or
against permitting or suffering any lien on such revenues or property;
(4)  covenant with respect to limitations on its right to sell, lease, or
otherwise dispose of any housing project and covenant as to what other, or
additional debts or obligations may be incurred by it;
(5)  covenant as to bonds to be issued and as to the issuance of bonds in
escrow or otherwise, and as to the use and disposition of the bond proceeds;
(6)  provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated bonds;
(7)  covenant against extending the time for the payment of its bonds or
interest on them;
(8)  covenant for the redemption of the bonds and provide the terms and
conditions for them;
(9)  covenant, subject to the limitations contained in this part as to the
rents and fees to be charged in the operation of a housing project or
projects, the amount to be raised each year or other period of time by rents,
fees, and other revenues, and as to the use and disposition to be made
thereof;
(10)  create or authorize the creation of special funds for money held for
construction or operating costs, debt service, reserves, or other purposes,
and  covenant as to the use and disposition of the money held in such funds;
(11)  prescribe the procedure, of any, by which the terms of any contract with
bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the proportion of outstanding bonds
which must consent to the action, and the manner in which consent shall be
given;
(12)  covenant as to the use, maintenance, and replacement of any or all of
its real or personal property and the insurance to be carried on it and the
use and disposition of insurance money;
(13)  covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon
breach by it of any covenant, condition, or obligation;
(14)  covenant and prescribe as to events of default and terms and conditions
upon which any or all of its bonds or obligations shall become or may be
declared due before maturity, and as to the terms and conditions upon which
such declaration and its consequences may be waived;
(15)  vest in any obligee of the authority or any specified proportion of them
the right to enforce the payment of bonds or any covenants securing or
relating to the bonds;
(16)  vest in an obligee with the right after default by the authority to take
possession of and use, operate, and manage any project or any part of it or
any funds connected with them, and collect the rents and revenues arising from
them and dispose of them in accordance with the agreement with the authority;
(17)  provide the powers and duties of an obligee and limit his liabilities;
(18)  provide the terms and conditions upon which such obligees may enforce
any covenant or rights securing or relating to the bonds;
(19)  exercise all or any part or combination of the powers granted and make
any covenants, other than and in addition to the covenants expressly
authorized in this section;
(20)  do any acts necessary, convenient, or desirable to secure its bonds; and
(21)  make any covenants or do any acts calculated to make the bonds more
marketable.
